Utah statutes.
67-25-302.   Restrictions on outside employment by executive branch employees.

(1)  An employee who is under the direction or control of an executive branch elected official may not engage in outside employment that:

(a)  constitutes a conflict of interest;

(b)  interferes with the ability of the employee to fulfill the employee's job responsibilities;

(c)  constitutes the provision of political services, political consultation, or lobbying;

(d)  involves the provision of consulting services, legal services, or other services to a person that the employee could, within the course and scope of the employee's primary employment, provide to the person; or

(e)  interferes with the hours that the employee is expected to perform work under the direction or control of an executive branch elected official, unless the employee takes authorized personal leave during the time that the person engages in the outside employment.

(2)  An executive branch official shall be subject to the same restrictions on outside employment as a career service employee.

(3)  This section does not prohibit an employee from advocating the position of the state office that employs the employee regarding legislative action or other government action.



Enacted by Chapter 425, 2013 General Session

